Utah statutes.
54-10a-302.   Powers of committee.

By a majority vote of a quorum of the committee, the committee may:

(1)  advise the director as to a duty or power of the office under Section 54-10a-301; and

(2)  give direction to the director on a policy objective related to a duty or power of the office under Section 54-10a-301 that serves the needs of residential consumers and small commercial consumers.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2009 General Session

